District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Expanding Downtown Affordable Housing Options Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47–860.02(a)(3) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended to
read as follows:
“(3) The affordable housing units are designed and administered in accordance
with the requirements of the Inclusionary Zoning Program; except that, for purposes of both
affordable and market rate housing units provided pursuant to this section, a room with a closet
that is designated as a bedroom or sleeping room on construction plans submitted with an
application for a building permit shall not be required to have immediate access to an exterior
window; provided, that the room complies with all natural light and ventilation requirements as


defined in the District of Columbia Building Code and that the market rate and affordable
housing units shall incorporate such unit configuration in the same proportion.”.
Sec. 3. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding new subsection (ss) is added to read as
follows:
“(ss) The Community Housing Downtown Feasibility Grant Program.
“(1) The Deputy Mayor shall establish a Community Housing Feasibility
Grant Program to support eligible commercial property owners to assess the financial feasibility
of converting an office building to community housing.
“(2) The Deputy Mayor may issue grants of up to $75,000 to eligible
commercial property owners to support preliminary analysis, including but not limited to
financial feasibility analysis, market research, project proformas, engineering and architectural
reports.
“(3) An eligible commercial property owner shall:
“(A) Own a commercial office building located in the eligible area, as
defined in D.C. Official Code § 47–860.01, that has been at least 50% vacant for the previous 12
months;
“(B) Be in good standing with the DLCP, OTR, and IRS; and
“(C) Submit an application to the Deputy Mayor that includes:
“(i) A cost estimate for the financial feasibility analysis;
“(ii) The name of the consultant;
“(iii) A scope of work; and


“(iv) A timeline for the completed analysis.
“(4) Grant recipients shall provide the Deputy Mayor a copy of the completed
financial feasibility analysis no later than two weeks from when it is transmitted from the
consultant to the grant recipient.
“(5) For the purposes of this section, the term “community housing” means a
building with sleeping units that include a natural light source and are independently rented and
lockable, and in which residents may share kitchen facilities and other common elements with
other residents in a building.”.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).